Utah statutes.
53A-20b-105.   Limited obligations.

Except as provided in Part 2, Charter School Credit Enhancement Program, bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the authority:

(1)  do not constitute a debt, moral obligation, or liability of the state, or of any county, city, town, school district, or any other political subdivision of the state;

(2)  do not constitute the loan of credit of the state or of any county, city, town, school district, or any other political subdivision of the state; and

(3)  may not be paid from funds other than loan payments or lease revenues received from a charter school or other funds pledged by a charter school.

